Illinois, session 104th, SB3529.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Make-Ready Infrastructure Rules Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) reducing the cost of building public and fleet 8    charging stations will benefit the State of Illinois by 9    (i) improving the health and environmental quality of the 10    residents of Illinois through reduced pollution, (ii) 11    reducing the transportation costs borne by consumers and 12    businesses, (iii) shifting the demand for imported 13    petroleum to locally produced electricity, and (iv) 14    increasing access to charging that is needed to electrify 15    the transportation sector, which puts downward pressure on 16    electric rates to the benefit of all utility customers; 17    and18        (2) it is necessary, in order to remove obstacles to 19    building public charging, to change the Commission's 20    practice from a practice of authorizing the electrical 21    distribution infrastructure that is located on the utility 22    side of a meter and that is needed to charge electric 23    vehicles on a case-by-case basis to a practice of treating   SB3529- 2 -LRB104 18278 AAS 31718 b1    the electrical distribution infrastructure and any 2    associated design, engineering, and construction work the 3    same as other necessary distribution infrastructure in an 4    electric utility's Multi-Year Integrated Grid Plan that is 5    authorized by the Commission on an ongoing basis. 6    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Commission" means the Illinois Commerce Commission.8    "Electric vehicle" means (i) a battery-powered electric 9vehicle that is operated solely by electricity or (ii) a 10plug-in hybrid electric vehicle that operates on electricity 11and gasoline and has a battery that can be recharged from an 12external source.13    "Electric vehicle charging station" means a station that 14delivers electricity from a source outside of an electric 15vehicle and into one or more electric vehicles.16    "Electrification" means any new use of electricity, 17expanded use of electricity, or change in the use of 18electricity, including, but not limited to, uses in the 19industrial, commercial, agricultural, housing, or 20transportation sectors.21    "Electrical distribution infrastructure" means poles, 22vaults, service drops, transformers, mounting pads, trenching, 23conduit, wire, cable, meters, and other equipment as necessary 24and any associated engineering and civil construction work. 25    "Electric utility" means an electric utility serving more   SB3529- 3 -LRB104 18278 AAS 31718 b1than 500,000 customers in this State.2    "Make-ready electrical infrastructure" means any 3electrical and construction work that is necessary between the 4distribution circuit and the connection point of charging 5equipment.6    "Utility side of the meter" means all the equipment, 7wires, transformers, and other electrical equipment that 8belong to a public utility and are used to deliver electrical 9service up to the point of the meter itself. 10    Section 15. Provision of make-ready electrical 11infrastructure on the utility side of the meter.12    (a) An electric utility shall propose a new rule, before 13the electric utility submits its next Multi-Year Integrated 14Rate Plan, that authorizes the electric utility to design and 15deploy all electrical distribution infrastructure on the 16utility side of the meter for all customers who have installed 17separately metered or submetered infrastructure to support 18electric vehicle charging stations, other than charging 19stations in single-family residences. The electric utility 20shall recover its revenue requirement for the design and 21deployment of such electrical distribution infrastructure 22through periodic Multi-Year Integrated Rate Plan proceedings 23or through other methods determined by the Commission by rule. 24In a Multi-Year Integrated Rate Plan proceeding, the electric 25utility's costs shall be treated the same as costs incurred by   SB3529- 4 -LRB104 18278 AAS 31718 b1the electric utility for other necessary distribution 2infrastructure.3    (b) The Commission shall require an electric utility to 4provide an accurate and full accounting of all the electric 5utility's expenses related to electrical distribution 6infrastructure under this Section and shall apply appropriate 7penalties to an electric utility that is not accurately 8tracking all expenses.9    (c) The new rule proposed under this Section, once 10effective, shall be offered to customers as an alternative to 11the transmission line extension rules in place as of the 12effective date of this Act for electric vehicle 13infrastructure, and any customer allowances established under 14the new rule shall be based on the full useful life of the 15electrical distribution infrastructure. The Commission may 16revise the policy described in subsection (a) and this 17subsection (c) after the completion of the Multi-Year 18Integrated Grid Plan of the electric utility following the 19Multi-Year Integrated Grid Plan during which the proposal was 20filed if the Commission determines that a change in the policy 21is necessary to ensure just and reasonable rates for 22ratepayers. Electric utilities shall take reasonable efforts 23to ensure that any infrastructure built pursuant to this 24Section is efficiently sized and operated. Such efforts 25include, but are not limited to, considering customers' 26reasonably foreseeable load management activities and   SB3529- 5 -LRB104 18278 AAS 31718 b1deploying distributed energy resources.